src/morphology/incoming/rules-verb-root-aspect.script
# re-write rules that correct the multiple exceptions occurring at the morpheme boundary between verb root and aspectual suffixes

define habSeq ccClassFG verbTypeFG habMarker habAspect;
define punctSeq ccClassFG verbTypeFG punctMarker punctAspect; 


define itehrHab {'s} -> {as} || rootBM {itehr} habSeq _ ;
define itehrPunct {'} -> {e'} || rootBM {itehr} punctSeq _ ;

define itehrAsp itehrHab .o. itehrPunct;

#define allRootAspect itehrHab .o. itehrPunct;
#regex allRootAspect;

#define allRootAspect {itehr} -> {ITEHR};
define allRootAspect [...] -> {***} || _ verbTypeFG;

push allRootAspect
